oss_proto.lexc
LEXICON AdvIndLabel
+ADV+PronType=Ind:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind:т Case ;

LEXICON AdvIntLabel
+ADV+PronType=Int:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int:т Case ;

LEXICON AdvTotLabel
+ADV+PronType=Tot:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot:т Case ;

LEXICON AdvNegLabel
+ADV+PronType=Neg:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg:т Case ;

### Словоизменение

LEXICON AdjInfl
+Degree=Cmp:^дӕр #;

LEXICON Case
+Case=Gen:$ы #;
+Case=Num:$ы #;
+Case=Dat:$ӕн #;
+Case=All:$мӕ #;
+Case=Ine:$ы #;
+Case=Abl:$ӕй #;
+Case=Sup:$ыл #; 
+Case=Equ:$ау #;
+Case=Com:$имӕ #; 
+Case=Dir:$ырдӕм #;
+Case=Rcs:$ырдыгӕй #;

###

LEXICON VIntrStemPres
+VerbForm=Fin:0 FinIntrStemPres ;
+VerbForm=Inf:^ын #;
+VerbForm=Inf2:^ӕн #;
+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Pres+Voice=Act:^ӕг #; 
+VerbForm=Part2+Tense=Pres+Voice=Act:^аг #; 
+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Fut+Voice=Pass:^инаг #; 
+VerbForm=Conv:^гӕ #;
+VerbForm=Dest:^ӕггаг #;
+VerbForm=Conv+Case=Abl:^гӕйӕ #;

LEXICON VIntrStemPast
+VerbForm=Fin:0 FinIntrStemPast ;

LEXICON VTrStemPres
+VerbForm=Fin:0 FinTrStemPres ;
+VerbForm=Inf:^ын #;
+VerbForm=Inf2:^ӕн #;
+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Pres+Voice=Act:^ӕг #; 
+VerbForm=Part2+Tense=Pres+Voice=Act:^аг #; 
+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Fut+Voice=Pass:^инаг #; 
+VerbForm=Conv:^гӕ #;
+VerbForm=Dest:^ӕггаг #;
+VerbForm=Conv+Case=Abl:^гӕйӕ #;

LEXICON VTrStemPast
+VerbForm=Fin:0 FinTrStemPast ;

###

LEXICON FinIntrStemPres
+Mood=Ind:0 IndIntrStemPres;
+Mood=Sub:0 Sub ;
+Mood=Opt:0 Opt ;
+Mood=Imp:0 Imp;

LEXICON FinIntrStemPast
+Mood=Ind:0 IndIntrStemPast ;
+Mood=Irr:0 Irr ;

LEXICON FinTrStemPres
+Mood=Ind:0 IndTrStemPres;
+Mood=Sub:0 Sub ;
+Mood=Opt:0 Opt ;
+Mood=Imp:0 Imp;

LEXICON FinTrStemPast
+Mood=Ind:0 IndTrStemPast ;
+Mood=Irr:0 Irr ;

###

LEXICON IndIntrStemPres
+Tense=Pres:0 Pres ;
+Tense=Fut:0 Fut ;

LEXICON IndIntrStemPast
+Tense=Past:0 IntrPast ;

LEXICON IndTrStemPres
+Tense=Pres:0 Pres ;
+Tense=Fut:0 Fut ;

LEXICON IndTrStemPast
+Tense=Past:0 TrPast ;

###

LEXICON IntrPast 
+Number=Sing+Person=1:^тӕн #;
+Number=Sing+Person=2:^тӕ #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:0 #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^и #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^ис #;
+Number=Plur+Person=1:^ыстӕм #;
+Number=Plur+Person=2:^ыстут #;
+Number=Plur+Person=3:^ысты #;

LEXICON TrPast
+Number=Sing+Person=1:^он #;
+Number=Sing+Person=2:^ай #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^а #;
+Number=Plur+Person=1:^ам #;
+Number=Plur+Person=2:^ат #;
+Number=Plur+Person=3:^ой #;

###

LEXICON Pres 
+Number=Sing+Person=1:^ын #;
+Number=Sing+Person=2:^ыс #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^ы #;
+Number=Plur+Person=1:^ӕм #;
+Number=Plur+Person=2:^ут #;
+Number=Plur+Person=3:^ынц #;

LEXICON Fut
+Number=Sing+Person=1:^дзынӕн #;
+Number=Sing+Person=2:^дзынӕ #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^дзӕн #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^дзӕни #;
+Number=Sing+Person=3:^дзӕнис #;
+Number=Plur+Person=1:^дзыстӕм #;
+Number=Plur+Person=2:^дзыстут #;
+Number=Plur+Person=3:^дзысты #;

LEXICON Sub 
+Person=1+Number=Sing:^он #; 
+Person=2+Number=Sing:^ай #; 
+Person=3+Number=Sing:^а #; 
+Person=1+Number=Plur:^ӕм #; 
+Person=2+Number=Plur:^ат #; 
+Person=3+Number=Plur:^ой #;

LEXICON Opt 
+Person=1+Number=Sing:^ин #; 
+Person=2+Number=Sing:^ис #; 
+Person=3+Number=Sing:^ид #;
+Person=1+Number=Plur:^иккам #;
+Person=2+Number=Plur:^иккат #; 
+Person=3+Number=Plur:^иккой #;

LEXICON Imp 
+Person=2+Number=Sing:0 #; 
+Person=3+Number=Sing:^ӕд #; 
+Person=2+Number=Plur:^ут #; 
+Person=3+Number=Plur:^ӕнт #;

###

LEXICON Irr
+Person=1+Number=Sing:^аин #;
+Person=2+Number=Sing:^аис #; 
+Person=3+Number=Sing:^аид #; 
+Person=1+Number=Plur:^аиккам #; 
+Person=2+Number=Plur:^аиккат #;
+Person=3+Number=Plur:^аиккой #;

LEXICON Adv
куы AdvIntLabel ;
кӕм AdvIntLabel ;
кӕдӕм AdvIntLabel ;
куыдӕм AdvIntLabel ;
кӕцӕй AdvIntLabel ;
кӕд AdvIntLabel ;
куыд AdvIntLabel ;
цӕмӕн AdvIntLabel ;
цӕмӕй AdvIntLabel ;
цалынмӕ AdvIntLabel ;
цӕмӕ AdvIntLabel ;
искуы AdvIndLabel ;
искуыд AdvIndLabel ;
искӕм AdvIndLabel ;
искӕдӕм AdvIndLabel ;
искуыдӕм AdvIndLabel ;
искӕд AdvIndLabel ;
истӕмӕн AdvIndLabel ;
истӕмӕй AdvIndLabel ;
истӕмӕ AdvIndLabel ;
куыддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
кӕмдӕр AdvIndLabel ;
кӕдӕмдӕр AdvIndLabel ;
куыдӕмдӕр AdvIndLabel ;
кӕддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
цӕмӕндӕр AdvIndLabel ;
цӕмӕйдӕр AdvIndLabel ;
цӕмӕдӕр AdvIndLabel ;
куыддӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
кӕмдӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
кӕдӕмдӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
куыдӕмдӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
кӕддӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
цӕмӕндӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
цӕмӕйдӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
цӕмӕдӕриддӕр AdvIndLabel ;
алкӕм AdvTotLabel ;
алкӕд AdvTotLabel ;
алкӕдӕм AdvTotLabel ;
алкуыдӕм AdvTotLabel ;
никуы AdvNegLabel ;
никӕм AdvNegLabel ;
никӕд AdvNegLabel ;
никӕдӕм AdvNegLabel ;
никуыдӕм AdvNegLabel ;
макуы AdvNegLabel ;
макӕм AdvNegLabel ;
макӕд AdvNegLabel ;
макӕдӕм AdvNegLabel ;
макуыдӕм AdvNegLabel ;
